Illinois, session 104th, HB423.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Privacy of Adult Victims of Criminal Sexual 5Offenses Act is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (725 ILCS 191/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Privacy of Adult Victims of Criminal Sexual Offenses Act.9(Source: P.A. 102-652, eff. 1-1-22.)